New Jersey, session 221, S899.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Attorney General shall create a voting fraud task force in the Division of Criminal Justice, Specialized Crimes Bureau to investigate and prosecute crimes involving voting fraud. The task force shall be comprised of members of State, county, and municipal law enforcement agencies, as determined by the Attorney General, and shall utilize a coordinated law enforcement strategy to address voting fraud in this State. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month next following enactment.